Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1409
Candidate, defined.

(1) Candidate shall mean an individual: (a) Who files, or on behalf of whom is filed, a fee, affidavit, nomination papers, or nominating petition for an elective office; (b) whose nomination as a candidate for elective office by a political party caucus, committee, or convention is certified to the appropriate filing official; (c) who is an officeholder who is the subject of a recall vote; or (d) who receives a contribution, makes an expenditure, or gives consent for another person to receive a contribution or make an expenditure with a view to bringing about the individual's nomination or election to an elective office, whether or not the specific elective office for which the individual will seek nomination or election is known at the time the contribution is received or the expenditure is made. An elected officeholder shall, if eligible under law, be considered to be a candidate for reelection to that same office for the purposes of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act only.

(2) Candidate shall not include any individual who is a candidate within the meaning of the Federal Election Campaign Act of 1971, 2 U.S.C. 431, as such section existed on January 1, 2006.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 9;

Laws 1980, LB 535, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 3.